Wisconsin, session 2025, AB409.
do enact as follows:AB409,11Section 1. 346.072 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB409,2,32346.072 (title) Passing certain stopped emergency or roadside service 3vehicles.AB409,24Section 2. 346.072 (1g) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB409,2,55346.072 (1g) (intro.) In this section, “emergency:AB409,2,66(bm) Emergency or roadside service vehicle” means any of the following:AB409,37Section 3. 346.072 (1g) (a) to (d) of the statutes are renumbered 346.072 (1g) 8(bm) 1. to 4.AB409,49Section 4. 346.072 (1g) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB409,2,1110346.072 (1g) (am) “Disabled vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is stopped 11and to which any of the following apply:AB409,2,12121. The motor vehicle is displaying warning or hazard lights.AB409,2,14132. Emergency flares or other emergency warning devices are placed near the 14motor vehicle.AB409,2,16153. One or more persons are attending the motor vehicle and visible to passing 16motorists.AB409,517Section 5. 346.072 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB409,3,218346.072 (1m) If an emergency or roadside service vehicle or a disabled vehicle 19is parked or standing on or within 12 feet of a roadway, the operator of a motor 20vehicle approaching the emergency or roadside service vehicle or disabled vehicle 1shall proceed with due regard for all other traffic and shall do either of the 2following:AB409,3,93(a) Move the motor vehicle into a lane that is not the lane nearest the parked 4or standing emergency or roadside service vehicle or disabled vehicle and continue 5traveling in that lane until safely clear of the emergency or roadside service vehicle 6or disabled vehicle. This paragraph applies only if the roadway has at least two 7lanes for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching motor vehicle and if 8the approaching motor vehicle may change lanes safely and without interfering 9with any vehicular traffic.AB409,3,1510(b) Slow the motor vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for traffic conditions, and 11operate the motor vehicle at a reduced speed until completely past the emergency or 12roadside service vehicle or disabled vehicle. This paragraph applies only if the 13roadway has only one lane for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching 14motor vehicle or if the approaching motor vehicle may not change lanes safely and 15without interfering with any vehicular traffic.AB409,3,1616